src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-3lex_piivtas_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../..//generator-dict-gt-norm.hfstol
    Morph: ../../analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfstol
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Noun - piivtâs: # ok
    piivtâs+N+Sg+Nom: piivtâs
    piivtâs+N+Sg+Gen: pihtâs
    piivtâs+N+Sg+Acc: pihtâs
    piivtâs+N+Sg+Ill: pihtâsân
    piivtâs+N+Sg+Loc: pihtâsist
    piivtâs+N+Sg+Com: pihtâsáin
    piivtâs+N+Sg+Abe: pihtâsttáá
    piivtâs+N+Ess: pivtâsin
    piivtâs+N+Par: pivtâsid
    piivtâs+N+Pl+Nom: pihtâseh
    piivtâs+N+Pl+Gen: pihtâsij
    piivtâs+N+Pl+Acc: [pihtâsijd, pihtsijd]
    piivtâs+N+Pl+Ill: pihtâsáid
    piivtâs+N+Pl+Loc: pihtâsijn
    piivtâs+N+Pl+Com: [pihtâsijguin, pihtâsijgijn]
    piivtâs+N+Pl+Abe: pihtâsijttáá

  Noun - kiirâs: # 
    kiirâs+N+Sg+Nom: kiirâs
    kiirâs+N+Sg+Gen: kirrâs
    kiirâs+N+Sg+Acc: kirrâs
    kiirâs+N+Sg+Ill: kirrâsân
    kiirâs+N+Sg+Loc: kirrâsist
    kiirâs+N+Sg+Com: kirrâsáin
    kiirâs+N+Sg+Abe: kirrâsttáá
    kiirâs+N+Ess: kirâsin
    kiirâs+N+Par: kirâsid
    kiirâs+N+Pl+Nom: kirrâseh
    kiirâs+N+Pl+Gen: kirrâsij
    kiirâs+N+Pl+Acc: kirrâsijd
    kiirâs+N+Pl+Ill: kirrâsáid
    kiirâs+N+Pl+Loc: kirrâsijn
    kiirâs+N+Pl+Com: [kirrâsijguin, kirrâsijgijn]
    kiirâs+N+Pl+Abe: kirrâsijttáá

  Noun - raagâs:
    raagâs+N+Sg+Nom: raagâs
    raagâs+N+Sg+Gen: raggâs
    raagâs+N+Sg+Acc: raggâs
    raagâs+N+Sg+Ill: raggâsân
    raagâs+N+Sg+Loc: raggâsist
    raagâs+N+Sg+Com: raggâsáin
    raagâs+N+Sg+Abe: raggâsttáá
    raagâs+N+Ess: ragâsin
    raagâs+N+Par: ragâsid
    raagâs+N+Pl+Nom: raggâseh
    raagâs+N+Pl+Gen: raggâsij
    raagâs+N+Pl+Acc: raggâsijd
    raagâs+N+Pl+Ill: raggâsáid
    raagâs+N+Pl+Loc: raggâsijn
    raagâs+N+Pl+Com: [raggâsijguin, raggâsijgijn]
    raagâs+N+Pl+Abe: raggâsijttáá

  Noun - laaiđâs:
    laaiđâs+N+Sg+Nom: laaiđâs
    laaiđâs+N+Sg+Gen: laiđâs
    laaiđâs+N+Sg+Acc: laiđâs
    laaiđâs+N+Sg+Ill: laiđâsân
    laaiđâs+N+Sg+Loc: laiđâsist
    laaiđâs+N+Sg+Com: laiđâsáin
    laaiđâs+N+Sg+Abe: laiđâsttáá
    laaiđâs+N+Ess: laiđâsin
    laaiđâs+N+Par: laiđâsid
    laaiđâs+N+Pl+Nom: laiđâseh
    laaiđâs+N+Pl+Gen: laiđâsij
    laaiđâs+N+Pl+Acc: laiđâsijd
    laaiđâs+N+Pl+Ill: laiđâsáid
    laaiđâs+N+Pl+Loc: laiđâsijn
    laaiđâs+N+Pl+Com: [laiđâsijguin, laiđâsijgijn]
    laaiđâs+N+Pl+Abe: laiđâsijttáá

  Noun - skoođâs: # ok
    skoođâs+N+Sg+Nom: skoođâs
    skoođâs+N+Sg+Gen: skođđâs
    skoođâs+N+Sg+Acc: skođđâs
    skoođâs+N+Sg+Ill: skođđâsân
    skoođâs+N+Sg+Loc: skođđâsist
    skoođâs+N+Sg+Com: skođđâsáin
    skoođâs+N+Sg+Abe: skođđâsttáá
    skoođâs+N+Ess: skođâsin
    skoođâs+N+Par: skođâsid
    skoođâs+N+Pl+Nom: skođđâseh
    skoođâs+N+Pl+Gen: skođđâsij
    skoođâs+N+Pl+Acc: skođđâsijd
    skoođâs+N+Pl+Ill: skođđâsáid
    skoođâs+N+Pl+Loc: skođđâsijn
    skoođâs+N+Pl+Com: [skođđâsijguin, skođđâsijgijn]
    skoođâs+N+Pl+Abe: skođđâsijttáá

  Noun - vaajâs:
    vaajâs+N+Sg+Nom: vaajâs
    vaajâs+N+Sg+Gen: vaijâs
    vaajâs+N+Sg+Acc: vaijâs
    vaajâs+N+Sg+Ill: vaijâsân
    vaajâs+N+Sg+Loc: vaijâsist
    vaajâs+N+Sg+Com: vaijâsáin
    vaajâs+N+Sg+Abe: vaijâsttáá
    vaajâs+N+Ess: vajâsin
    vaajâs+N+Par: vajâsid
    vaajâs+N+Pl+Nom: vaijâseh
    vaajâs+N+Pl+Gen: vaijâsij
    vaajâs+N+Pl+Acc: vaijâsijd
    vaajâs+N+Pl+Ill: vaijâsáid
    vaajâs+N+Pl+Loc: vaijâsijn
    vaajâs+N+Pl+Com: [vaijâsijguin, vaijâsijgijn]
    vaajâs+N+Pl+Abe: vaijâsijttáá

  Noun - spääilih: # MLO, ok
    spääilih+N+Sg+Nom: spääilih
    spääilih+N+Sg+Gen: späilih
    spääilih+N+Sg+Acc: späilih
    spääilih+N+Sg+Ill: späilihân
    spääilih+N+Sg+Loc: späilihist
    spääilih+N+Sg+Com: späiliháin
    spääilih+N+Sg+Abe: späilihttáá
    spääilih+N+Ess: späilihin
    spääilih+N+Par: späilihid
    spääilih+N+Pl+Nom: späiliheh
    spääilih+N+Pl+Gen: späilihij
    spääilih+N+Pl+Acc: späilihijd
    spääilih+N+Pl+Ill: späiliháid
    spääilih+N+Pl+Loc: späilihijn
    spääilih+N+Pl+Com: [späilihijguin, späilihijgijn]
    spääilih+N+Pl+Abe: späilihijttáá

  Noun - njuođâs: # ok, MLO
    njuođâs+N+Sg+Nom: njuođâs
    njuođâs+N+Sg+Gen: njuottâs
    njuođâs+N+Sg+Acc: njuottâs
    njuođâs+N+Sg+Ill: njuottâsân
    njuođâs+N+Sg+Loc: njuottâsist
    njuođâs+N+Sg+Com: njuottâsáin
    njuođâs+N+Sg+Abe: njuottâsttáá
    njuođâs+N+Ess: njuođâsin
    njuođâs+N+Par: njuođâsid
    njuođâs+N+Pl+Nom: njuottâseh
    njuođâs+N+Pl+Gen: njuottâsij
    njuođâs+N+Pl+Acc: njuottâsijd
    njuođâs+N+Pl+Ill: njuottâsáid
    njuođâs+N+Pl+Loc: njuottâsijn
    njuođâs+N+Pl+Com: [njuottâsijguin, njuottâsijgijn]
    njuođâs+N+Pl+Abe: njuottâsijttáá

  Noun - mielgâs: 
    mielgâs+N+Sg+Nom: mielgâs
    mielgâs+N+Sg+Gen: mielgâs
    mielgâs+N+Sg+Acc: mielgâs
    mielgâs+N+Sg+Ill: mielgâsân
    mielgâs+N+Sg+Loc: mielgâsist
    mielgâs+N+Sg+Com: mielgâsáin
    mielgâs+N+Sg+Abe: mielgâsttáá
    mielgâs+N+Ess: mielgâsin
    mielgâs+N+Par: mielgâsid
    mielgâs+N+Pl+Nom: mielgâseh
    mielgâs+N+Pl+Gen: mielgâsij
    mielgâs+N+Pl+Acc: mielgâsijd
    mielgâs+N+Pl+Ill: mielgâsáid
    mielgâs+N+Pl+Loc: mielgâsijn
    mielgâs+N+Pl+Com: [mielgâsijguin, mielgâsijgijn]
    mielgâs+N+Pl+Abe: mielgâsijttáá

#  Noun - ruonâs: # now only one ruonâs 
#    ruonâs+N+Sg+Nom: ruonâs
#    ruonâs+N+Sg+Gen: ruonnâs
#    ruonâs+N+Sg+Acc: ruonnâs
#    ruonâs+N+Sg+Ill: ruonâsân
#    ruonâs+N+Sg+Loc: ruonâsist
#    ruonâs+N+Sg+Com: ruonâsáin
#    ruonâs+N+Sg+Abe: ruonnâsttáá
#    ruonâs+N+Ess: ruonâsin
#    ruonâs+N+Par: ruonâsid
#    ruonâs+N+Pl+Nom: ruonâseh
#    ruonâs+N+Pl+Gen: ruonâsij
#    ruonâs+N+Pl+Acc: ruonâsijd
#    ruonâs+N+Pl+Ill: ruonâsáid
#    ruonâs+N+Pl+Loc: ruonâsijn
#    ruonâs+N+Pl+Com: [ruonâsijguin, ruonâsijgijn]
#    ruonâs+N+Pl+Abe: ruonâsijttáá

  Noun - siärvus: 
    siärvus+N+Sg+Nom: siärvus
    siärvus+N+Sg+Gen: siärvus
    siärvus+N+Sg+Acc: siärvus
    siärvus+N+Sg+Ill: siärvusân
    siärvus+N+Sg+Loc: siärvusist
    siärvus+N+Sg+Com: siärvusáin
    siärvus+N+Sg+Abe: siärvusttáá
    siärvus+N+Ess: siärvusin
    siärvus+N+Par: siärvusid
    siärvus+N+Pl+Nom: siärvuseh
    siärvus+N+Pl+Gen: siärvusij
    siärvus+N+Pl+Acc: siärvusijd
    siärvus+N+Pl+Ill: siärvusáid
    siärvus+N+Pl+Loc: siärvusijn
    siärvus+N+Pl+Com: [siärvusijguin, siärvusijgijn]
    siärvus+N+Pl+Abe: siärvusijttáá

  Noun - suormâs:
    suormâs+N+Sg+Nom: suormâs
    suormâs+N+Sg+Gen: suormâs
    suormâs+N+Sg+Acc: suormâs
    suormâs+N+Sg+Ill: suormâsân
    suormâs+N+Sg+Loc: suormâsist
    suormâs+N+Sg+Com: suormâsáin
    suormâs+N+Sg+Abe: suormâsttáá
    suormâs+N+Ess: suormâsin
    suormâs+N+Par: suormâsid
    suormâs+N+Pl+Nom: suormâseh
    suormâs+N+Pl+Gen: suormâsij
    suormâs+N+Pl+Acc: suormâsijd
    suormâs+N+Pl+Ill: suormâsáid
    suormâs+N+Pl+Loc: suormâsijn
    suormâs+N+Pl+Com: [suormâsijguin, suormâsijgijn]
    suormâs+N+Pl+Abe: suormâsijttáá

  Noun - čiepâs: # ok, MLO
    čiepâs+N+Sg+Nom: čiepâs
    čiepâs+N+Sg+Gen: čieppâs
    čiepâs+N+Sg+Acc: čieppâs
    čiepâs+N+Sg+Ill: čieppâsân
    čiepâs+N+Sg+Loc: čieppâsist
    čiepâs+N+Sg+Com: čieppâsáin
    čiepâs+N+Sg+Abe: čieppâsttáá
    čiepâs+N+Ess: [čiepâsin, čieppâsin]
    čiepâs+N+Par: [čiepâsid, čieppâsid]
    čiepâs+N+Pl+Nom: čieppâseh
    čiepâs+N+Pl+Gen: čieppâsij
    čiepâs+N+Pl+Acc: čieppâsijd
    čiepâs+N+Pl+Ill: čieppâsáid
    čiepâs+N+Pl+Loc: čieppâsijn
    čiepâs+N+Pl+Com: [čieppâsijguin, čieppâsijgijn]
    čiepâs+N+Pl+Abe: čieppâsijttáá
